District of Columbia statutes.
8-1306

Variance.

The Mayor may grant a variance not to exceed 180 days upon a showing that compliance with the requirements of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto would result in an unreasonable financial hardship, and that the public health and welfare would not be endangered.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 7, 24 DCR 6289
1981 Ed., § 6-706.
1973 Ed., § 6-526.